Utah statutes.
70A-2a-109.   Option to accelerate at will.
(1)  A term providing that one party or his successor in interest may
accelerate payment or performance or require collateral or additional
collateral "at will" or "when he deems himself insecure" or in words of
similar import must be construed to mean that he has power to do so only if he
in good faith believes that the prospect of payment or performance is
impaired.
(2)  With respect to a consumer lease, the burden of establishing good faith
under Subsection (1) is on the party who exercised the power; otherwise the
burden of establishing lack of good faith is on the party against whom the
power has been exercised.
